Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 4 Regulatory Oversight

19-4-1.
Examination on application by depositors, stockholders, directors, or trustees.

Upon the written application, under oath, to the director, or the director’s designee, by depositors representing five percent (5%) of the deposits of any financial institution, as shown by the last published return of the financial institution, or upon the written application to the director, or the director’s designee, of persons holding at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding capital stock of any regulated institution, or upon the written application to the director, or the director’s designee, of at least one third (1/3) in number of the board of directors or trustees of any regulated institution, setting forth their interest and the reasons for making an examination, and requesting him or her to examine the regulated institution, the director, or the director’s designee, may make or cause to be made a full investigation or examination of its affairs as provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 4.

19-4-2.
Periodic examinations — Access to records.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall, whenever he or she considers it advisable, but at least once in each year, examine each regulated institution. However, the director may extend the examination period for eligible financial institutions to at least once every eighteen (18) months. For the purposes of this section, an eligible financial institution means a financial institution with total assets of less than two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) that has not experienced a change in control in the last twelve-month (12) period and that is:

Well capitalized;

Well managed;

Highly rated by state and federal banking regulatory agencies; and

Not subject to a formal enforcement proceeding or order.

In addition, the director may also consider other factors that may be considered by federal banking regulatory agencies when those agencies determine whether financial institutions qualify for an extended examination cycle. At each examination the director, or the director’s designee, shall have free access to all books, records, papers, assets and any other information deemed necessary by the director, or the director’s designee, to ascertain the regulated institution’s condition; its ability to fulfill its obligations; and whether it has complied with the provisions of law.

The total cost of an examination made pursuant to this section shall be paid by the examined party and shall include the following expenses:

One hundred fifty percent (150%) of the salary and benefits of the examining personnel engaged in the examination shall be paid to the director to and for the use of the state. The assessment shall be in addition to any taxes and fees otherwise payable to the state. The total examination fees under this section payable in any one year shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for any one regulated institution;

All reasonable technology costs related to the examination process. Technology costs shall include the actual cost of software and hardware utilized in the examination process and the cost of training examination personnel in the proper use of the software or hardware; and

All necessary and reasonable education and training costs incurred by the state to maintain the proficiency and competence of the examination personnel. All such costs shall be incurred in accordance with appropriate state of Rhode Island regulations, guidelines, and procedures.

Expenses incurred pursuant to subsections (b)(2) and (b)(3) shall be allocated equally to each regulated institution no more frequently than annually and shall not exceed an annual average assessment of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per regulated institution for any given three (3) calendar-year period. All revenues collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited as general revenues. That assessment shall be in addition to any taxes and fees otherwise payable to the state.

The director, or the director’s designee, is authorized to accept in his or her discretion the report of any examination conducted by any federal banking regulatory or federal deposit insuring agencies or other state banking regulatory agency in lieu of an examination by the director, or the director’s designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 4; P.L. 1999, ch. 156, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 78, § 1.

19-4-3.
Records of examinations and reports.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall preserve a full record of each examination. The records and information contained in reports of the regulated institution may be provided by the director, or the director’s designee, to the regulated institution examined.

Confidential treatment.

Documents, materials, or other information in the possession or control of the division of banking that are obtained by or disclosed to the director, or the director’s designee, or any other person in the course of an examination or investigation made pursuant to this chapter shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be subject to chapter 2 of title 38, shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action. However, the director is authorized to use the documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as a part of the director’s official duties.

Neither the director nor any person who received documents, materials, or other information while acting under the authority of the director, or with whom such documents, materials, or other information are shared pursuant to this section, shall be permitted or required to testify in any private civil action concerning any confidential documents, materials, or information subject to this section.

In order to assist in the performance of the director’s duties, the director:

May share documents, materials, or other information, including the confidential and privileged documents, materials or information subject to subsection (b) with other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies and federal deposit insuring agencies, with the Conference of State Banking Supervisors (CSBS), and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and with state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities, provided that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the document, material, or other information, and has verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality;

May receive documents, materials, or information, including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information from other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies and federal deposit insuring agencies, from the CSBS, and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and from state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities, and shall maintain as confidential or privileged any document, material or information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material or information; and

May enter into written agreements with other state, federal and international regulatory agencies and federal depositing insuring agencies, with the CSBS, and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and with state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities governing sharing and use of information provided pursuant to this section consistent with this section.

The sharing of information by the director pursuant to this section shall not constitute a delegation of regulatory authority or rulemaking, and the director is solely responsible for the administration, execution, and enforcement of the provisions of this section.

No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the document, materials, or information shall occur as a result of disclosure to the director under this section or as a result of sharing as authorized in subsection (b).

Documents, materials, or other information filed in the possession or control of the CSBS pursuant to this section shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be subject to chapter 2 of title 38, shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action.

The imparting of this information by the director, or the director’s designee, other than according to the provisions of this chapter shall be sufficient cause for removal, and any such deputy, assistant, or officer, who, except in the discharge of his or her official duty and other than as set out above, imparts this information shall be liable for a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) and this deputy or assistant may also be removed from office or employment by the director, or the director’s designee. These records, examinations, and reports are not subject to chapter 2 of title 38.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 4; P.L. 2001, ch. 128, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 145, § 1.

19-4-4.
Audits.

Every regulated institution audited by a licensed, independent certified public accountant pursuant to applicable federal law or regulation shall submit a copy of the audit to the director, or the director’s designee, within thirty (30) days of receipt of the audit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42.

19-4-5.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 7, effective June 29, 2022; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 7, effective June 29, 2022.

19-4-6.
Time and frequency of reports of financial institutions and credit unions.

Every financial institution and credit union, at those times that the director, or the director’s designee, shall require, but at least once in each calendar year, shall render a report to the director, or the director’s designee, signed and sworn to by its president, or a vice-president, and also by its secretary, treasurer, or auditor, and attested by at least three (3) of the members of its board of directors, showing accurately the condition of the financial institution or credit union at the close of business on any past day specified by the director, or the director’s designee, in the form and containing the information that the director, or the director’s designee, shall require; and the report shall be transmitted to the director, or the director’s designee, within thirty (30) days, exclusive of Sundays and holidays, after the director’s request. At the time of filing each report the sum of fifty-five dollars ($55.00) shall be paid by the financial institution or credit union to the director to and for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 18.

19-4-7.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 7, effective June 29, 2022; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 7, effective June 29, 2022.

19-4-8.
Delay of reports.

Any financial institution or credit union that delays transmission of any of the reports required by this chapter beyond the limits set by this chapter, unless additional time is granted in writing for proper cause by the director, or the director’s designee, shall pay a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each day of delay to and for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42.

19-4-9.
Reports to general assembly.

The director shall make available, by electronic means, the annual reports filed by all financial institutions and credit unions regulated by him or her and shall provide such reports to members of the public and general assembly upon request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42; P.L. 2015, ch. 82, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 105, § 9.

19-4-10.
Insurance of deposits.

Any regulated institution permitted by law to receive deposits, except a financial institution prevented from accepting deposits by its bylaws or agreement to form, shall maintain federal deposit insurance. Failure to maintain federal deposit insurance shall be deemed sufficient cause for the director, or the director’s designee, to revoke the agreement to form or right to do business of the noncomplying regulated institution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42.

19-4-11.
Summons of witnesses — Obstruction or refusal to give information — Prosecution of violations.

The director, or the director’s designee, may summon the directors, trustees, employees, officers, or agents of any regulated institution and any other witnesses that he or she thinks proper, and examine them relative to the affairs, transactions, and condition of the regulated institution, and for that purpose may administer oaths. Whoever, without justifiable cause, refuses to appear and testify when so required, or obstructs the director, or any of the director’s designees, in the performance of his or her duties, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year. If any person refuses to furnish any information requested by the director, or any of the director’s designees, under the authority of any chapter in this title, the director, or the director’s designee, may apply to the superior court and that court shall cause the person to come before it and shall inquire into the facts set forth in the application and may commit the person to jail until he or she shall comply with the request. If, in the opinion of the director, or the director’s designee, the regulated institution or its officers or trustees have violated any law relative to the regulated institution, the director, or the director’s designee, may report the violation to the attorney general, who may, on behalf of the state, institute a prosecution or other appropriate proceedings for the violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42.

19-4-12.
Order to cease unlawful or unsafe practices — Impairment of capital — Appeal.

Whenever it appears to the director, or the director’s designee, that a regulated institution has violated its agreement to form, or any law or regulation, or is conducting its business in an unauthorized or unsafe manner, or the regulated institution has been notified by its federal deposit insurer of its intent to terminate deposit insurance, the director, or the director’s designee, may exercise any or all of the following powers:

Restrict the withdrawal of deposits when he or she finds the restriction necessary for the protection of depositors;

Order any person to cease violating any provision of the banking laws of this state or any rule or regulation issued thereunder, or cease engaging in any unsafe or unsound or deceptive banking or credit union practices;

Order that capital be restored, to the extent that the capital of the financial institution or credit union has been impaired;

Suspend or remove any director, committee member, officer, or employee who becomes ineligible to hold his or her position or who, after receipt of an order to cease under this chapter, violates the banking laws of this state or a rule, regulation, or order issued thereunder, or who is reckless or incompetent in the conduct of the financial institution’s or credit union’s business. Each suspension or removal order shall specify the grounds therefor, and a copy of the order shall be sent to the financial institution or credit union concerned.

Any action taken pursuant to subsection (a) may be taken in the director’s, or the director’s designee’s, discretion before or after affording the regulated institution and/or affected individuals an opportunity for hearing. When an action is not preceded by an opportunity for hearing, such an opportunity must be afforded to the regulated institution and/or affected individuals within a reasonable time after the action; provided further, that a request for hearing subsequent to an action by the director, or the director’s designee, shall not act to stay the action of the director, or the director’s designee, pending the outcome of the hearing, although the director, or the director’s designee, may, in his or her discretion, grant a stay. All hearings shall be conducted pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42; P.L. 2013, ch. 50, § 4; P.L. 2013, ch. 57, § 4.

19-4-13.
Continuance of business after suspension prohibited.

After suspension of the right of a regulated institution to do business, the regulated institution affected shall cease to have any right to continue its business, except for the purpose of winding up the affairs of the regulated institution. Any officers, directors, or agents of the regulated institution thereafter selling shares of the regulated institution, or soliciting business for the regulated institution, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42.

19-4-14.
Appeal of orders — Enforcement.

Any person or regulated institution aggrieved by a final order of the director, or the director’s designee, made under the authority of this title may appeal to the superior court pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

The director, or the director’s designee, may apply to the superior court to enforce any administrative order issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42.

19-4-15.
Examination of books to determine violations — Prosecution of offenses.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall have authority to examine, at any time, the accounts, books, and papers of any person in the business of receiving money on deposit, in order to ascertain whether the person has violated or is violating any provision of this title.

Any person carrying on an unauthorized banking business shall forfeit to the state one thousand dollars ($1,000) a day for every day or part thereof during which the violation continues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42.

19-4-16.
Rules and regulations.

The director, or the director’s designee, may adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation and administration of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42.

19-4-17.
Unauthorized banking business.

No person, except regulated institutions, including any bank or trust company that has established a trust branch office in this state pursuant to the provisions of §

19-3.1-6(b)

, or banks or credit unions organized under the laws of the United States or of any other state within the United States shall use any sign at the place where its business is transacted, having on it any name containing the word or words “bank”, “savings bank”, “loan and investment bank”, “trust company”, “credit union”, or other word or words, indicating, in the opinion of the director, or the director’s designee, that the place or office is the place or office of a regulated institution or bank or credit union duly organized under the laws of the United States or of any other state within the United States. The secretary of state shall not accept for filing any articles of association or incorporation, or amendment thereof, containing the word or words without the approval of the director, or the director’s designee.

No person, except regulated institutions, including any bank or trust company that has established a trust branch office in this state pursuant to the provisions of §

19-3.1-6(b)

, or other banks or credit unions duly organized under the laws of the United States or of any other state within the United States, shall use or circulate any written or printed, or partly written and partly printed, paper whatsoever, having on it any name or other word or words indicating that its business is the business of a regulated institution or other bank or credit union duly organized under the laws of the United States or of any other state within the United States. No bank or credit union organized under the laws of any other state within the United States shall establish an office within this state or otherwise have a physical presence within this state for the purpose of receiving deposits, paying checks, lending money, or exercising trust powers within this state unless such bank or credit union has received approval from the director, or the director’s designee, for the establishment of an interstate branch office pursuant to chapter 7 of this title. No person except regulated institutions, banks, or credit unions organized under the laws of the United States or of any other state within the United States shall transact business in this state in any way or manner as to lead the public to believe, or as, in the opinion of the director, or the director’s designee, might lead the public to believe, that its business is that of a regulated institution or other bank or credit union duly organized under the laws of the United States or of any other state within the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42; P.L. 2003, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 174, § 3; P.L. 2003, ch. 178, § 3.

19-4-17.1.
Use of regulated financial institutions without permission prohibited.

Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a person, domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, association, limited-liability company, or similar entity shall not use the name, trade name, or trademark of any covered institution in any written or oral advertisement or solicitation for products or services, without the express written consent of the covered institution. For the purposes of this section, the word “covered institution” shall mean a regulated institution as defined in §

19-1-1

, or a lender or loan broker licensed under chapter 14 of title 19, or any subsidiary of any institution, lender, or broker; and the words “advertisement” or “solicitation” shall mean an email, direct-mail solicitation, or oral solicitation to a specifically identified consumer or that contains specific information on the account or loan of a specifically identified consumer.

A person, domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, association, limited-liability company, or similar entity shall not make reference to a covered institution without the express written consent of the covered institution or make reference to a loan number, or other specific loan information, on the outside of an envelope, visible through the envelope window, or on a postcard in connection with any written solicitation or an email for products or services to a specifically identified consumer.

A person, domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, association, limited-liability company, or similar entity shall not include a loan number, or other specific loan information, other than the loan amount, relative to a specifically identified consumer that is publicly available in a written or oral solicitation for the purchase of products or services unless the solicitation clearly and conspicuously states in bold-face type on the front page of the correspondence that the person, domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, association, limited-liability company, or similar entity is not sponsored by, or affiliated with, and that the solicitation is not authorized by the covered institution. The statement shall include the name, address, and telephone number of the person making the solicitation and that any loan information referenced was not provided by the covered institution. The statements required in this paragraph shall also be given at the time of any oral solicitation to a specifically identified consumer.

A person, domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, association, limited-liability company, association, or similar entity, which is considered to have violated this section, shall be considered to have engaged in an unfair and deceptive practice.

A covered institution that has had its name, trade name, or trademark used in violation of this section may, in addition to any other remedy provided by law, bring an action in the superior court in which venue the covered institution has an office to enjoin an act in violation of this section and recover damages. The court shall award damages in the amount of actual damages or ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation, whichever is greater. In any successful action for injunctive relief or for damages, the court shall award the covered institution, attorney’s fees and costs, including court costs.

This chapter shall not apply to, nor shall any action be brought against, the use of a name, trade name, or trademark of any covered institution where such use would constitute fair use under federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 152, § 1.

19-4-18.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 42.

19-4-19.
Resident agent — Financial institutions.

Each bank and lending institution doing business in this state, whether acting under state or federal authority, shall maintain a resident agent in this state who shall have authority to endorse insurance claim checks on behalf of those banks and lending institutions, which banks and lending institutions shall include, but are not limited to:

A bank, savings bank, or trust company, as defined in this title, its affiliates or subsidiaries;

A bank holding company, as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1841, its affiliates or subsidiaries;

Mortgage companies; and

Any other individual, corporation, partnership, or association authorized to take deposits and/or to make loans of money under the provisions of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 5, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 5, effective June 29, 2022.